Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 5

Vocational Services to the Blind — Vending Stands

71-4-501. Legislative intent — Construction.

It is the intent of the general assembly to grant to blind individuals a priority in the establishment and operation of vending facilities on public property in this state. To that end, this part shall be liberally construed to give the blind individuals who are eligible for such priority the greatest possible opportunities to operate such vending facilities so that they may become self-supporting.

Acts 1994, ch. 723, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 5, §§71-4-501—71-4-509 (Acts 1967, ch. 46, § 1; 1967, ch. 349, § 1; 1973, ch. 372, §§ 1-6; 1975, ch. 176, § 1; 1978, ch. 658, § 658; T.C.A., §§ 14-636, 14-637, 14-640—14-645; Acts 1983, ch. 473, § 1; 1985, ch. 240, § 1; T.C.A., §§14-14-501—14-14-508), concerning vocational services to the blind and vending stands, was repealed by Acts 1994, ch. 723, § 2, effective July 1, 1994. For present provisions, see this part.

Cross-References. Business enterprise program, title 71, ch. 4, part 4.

Attorney General Opinions. Property owned or leased by a local municipality, including jails and correctional centers, is subject to the provisions of T.C.A. §§71-4-501 through71-4-508, which require a municipality to give preference to blind vendors in operating vending facilities, OAG 01-128, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 119 (8/17/01).

Blind vendor contract, OAG 04-083, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 88 (4/30/04).

Applicability of the blind vendors program to fire stations, OAG 04-083, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 32 (4/30/04).

Applicability of the blind vendors program to the county sheriff's office, OAG 07-91, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 91 (2/21/06).

Applicability of blind vendors program to municipal property. OAG 11-39, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 41 (4/28/11).

71-4-502. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Blind individual” means any person who meets the requirements for services through the business enterprise program for the blind under part 4 of this chapter and who has been trained and licensed by the department to operate a vending facility under the program's requirements;

“Department” means the department of human services or its successor that has been designated under the Randolph-Sheppard Act (20 U.S.C. §§ 107-107f), as the state licensing agency;

“Priority” means the right of the department to establish on any public property a vending facility to be operated by a blind individual. This priority means that when the department has surveyed a public property and determined that such property is suitable for the location of a vending facility, it shall have the right of first refusal and the exclusive right to the operation of any and all vending facilities on any public property that it determines are capable of being operated by a blind individual that it licenses, or by an individual who may be operating the facility as a temporary manager until a licensed blind individual can assume the operation of the vending facility. Except as provided in subdivision (4) and §§ 71-4-504 — 71-4-506, the priority shall apply to all existing, altered, or new buildings, facilities, or grounds. This priority shall be exercised exclusively by the department in its sole discretion on behalf of legally blind individuals who are qualified and licensed as vending facility managers by the department and who are deemed capable of providing the type of service required by the management of the public property;

“Public property” means all property owned or leased by the state of Tennessee, any county, municipality, or any other entity that is created by act of the general assembly to perform any public function; provided, that primary and secondary schools, and entities created under title 42, and their operations, are specially excluded from this definition; and provided further, that institutions that are governed by the University of Tennessee system or the state university and community college system and their operations are also specifically excluded from this definition, except that the vending facilities presently in operation at such institutions on April 29, 1996, shall continue to operate at their present locations or, if necessary, at a location comparable in terms of potential patronage, with the priority established by this part. Moreover, the existing priority shall extend to any new structures on any of the campuses governed by the University of Tennessee or the state university and community college system and the priority shall also extend to the establishment of at least one (1) vending facility on any new campus that is developed either by the University of Tennessee system or the state university and community college system. Nothing in this part shall limit the ability of an institution that is governed by the University of Tennessee or the state university and community college system to contract for food services (cafeterias, restaurants, food courts and catering services) in new buildings or on new campuses; provided, that a site suitable to the institution, after consultation with the department, is also made available for a blind vendor to manage and operate automated vending machines and/or a counter service as jointly agreed to by the institution and department in the new building or on the new campus; and

“Vending facility” means a location or structure or space that may sell foods, beverages, confections, newspapers, periodicals, tobacco products, and other articles and services that are dispensed automatically by a machine or manually by sales personnel or attendants and that may be prepared on or off the premises in accordance with applicable health laws. A “vending facility” may consist, exclusively or in appropriate combination as determined by the department, of automatic vending machines, cafeterias, snack bars, catering services, food concession vehicles, cart services, shelters, counters, and any appropriate equipment necessary for the sale of articles or services described in this subdivision (5). A “vending facility” may encompass more than one (1) building on a public property.

Acts 1994, ch. 723, § 2; 1996, ch. 829, § 1; 2012, ch. 976, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 5, §§71-4-501—71-4-509 (Acts 1967, ch. 46, § 1; 1967, ch. 349, § 1; 1973, ch. 372, §§ 1-6; 1975, ch. 176, § 1; 1978, ch. 658, § 658; T.C.A., §§ 14-636, 14-637, 14-640—14-645; Acts 1983, ch. 473, § 1; 1985, ch. 240, § 1; T.C.A., §§14-14-501—14-14-508), concerning vocational services to the blind and vending stands, was repealed by Acts 1994, ch. 723, § 2, effective July 1, 1994. For present provisions, see this part.

Acts 2012, ch. 976, which amended the definition of “public property”, shall be known and may be cited as the “Scott Young Blind Vendors Act.”

Attorney General Opinions. Entities encompassed within the statutory definition of “public property” are subject to the priority found at subsection (3) of this section and must provide the department of human services notice and an opportunity to exercise its right of first refusal or, with regard to cafeterias, to submit a proposal for the operation of the proposed cafeteria, OAG 04-166, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 177 (11/19/04).

There are no specific statutory remedies for a public property's failure to recognize the priority established under subsection (3) of this section; instead, a dispute resolution mechanism for disputes that may arise between the department of human services and the management of public property “concerning any matter contained in this part” is provided pursuant to T.C.A. §71-4-507, OAG 04-166, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 177 (11/19/04).

Interpretation of T.C.A. §71-4-502(4), OAG 06-155, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 175 (10/9/06).

The statutory definition of the term “vending facility” gives the department of human services the discretion to determine the services that it will, or will not, perform while still retaining the statutory priority to other vending facility services under T.C.A. §§71-4-502(5) and 503, OAG 06-156, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 176 (10/9/06).

71-4-503. Vending facilities on public property — Priority — Establishment.

Whenever any new buildings or other facilities are to be constructed by the state or on any other public property or when any existing contracts expire or are changed in any way, the department shall be notified and it shall promptly make an investigation and survey of the public property to determine if, in its judgment, the location is suitable for one (1) or more vending facilities. If, in the department's judgment, the location is suitable for a vending facility, the department may exercise its priority to establish such a vending facility.

If the department exercises the priority under this part, it shall have the right to establish such a vending facility, and it shall provide the necessary alterations, plumbing and electrical services, the necessary equipment, merchandise, a licensed or temporary manager, and the appropriate supervision of the manager. The public property management shall cooperate with the department in whatever manner necessary in order for it to carry out this part. The space for the vending facilities and utilities shall be provided at no cost; provided, that the cost of telephone service shall not be the responsibility of the public property management. In cafeteria operations, the licensed or temporary manager may be required to pay a percentage of sales to the public property management in accordance with agreements negotiated between the department and the public property management.

Acts 1994, ch. 723, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 5, §§71-4-501—71-4-509 (Acts 1967, ch. 46, § 1; 1967, ch. 349, § 1; 1973, ch. 372, §§ 1-6; 1975, ch. 176, § 1; 1978, ch. 658, § 658; T.C.A., §§ 14-636, 14-637, 14-640—14-645; Acts 1983, ch. 473, § 1; 1985, ch. 240, § 1; T.C.A., §§14-14-501—14-14-508), concerning vocational services to the blind and vending stands, was repealed by Acts 1994, ch. 723, § 2, effective July 1, 1994. For present provisions, see this part.

Attorney General Opinions. The statutory definition of the term “vending facility” gives the department of human services the discretion to determine the services that it will, or will not, perform while still retaining the statutory priority to other vending facility services under T.C.A. §§71-4-502(5) and 503, OAG 06-156, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 176 (10/9/06).

Applicability of blind vendors program to municipal property. OAG 11-39, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 41 (4/28/11).

71-4-504. Vending machines in lieu of on-site manager.

If, after conducting a survey, the department determines that there is not sufficient population to support an on-site manager but the public property management desires vending machine services, the department shall have the right to place vending machines on the property and to make the necessary arrangements to ensure that vending machine services are provided and that the vending machines are properly maintained.

The income generated from the vending machines placed under the provisions of this section shall accrue to the unassigned funds held by the department for its blind vendors.

Acts 1994, ch. 723, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 5, §§71-4-501—71-4-509 (Acts 1967, ch. 46, § 1; 1967, ch. 349, § 1; 1973, ch. 372, §§ 1-6; 1975, ch. 176, § 1; 1978, ch. 658, § 658; T.C.A., §§ 14-636, 14-637, 14-640—14-645; Acts 1983, ch. 473, § 1; 1985, ch. 240, § 1; T.C.A., §§14-14-501—14-14-508), concerning vocational services to the blind and vending stands, was repealed by Acts 1994, ch. 723, § 2, effective July 1, 1994. For present provisions, see this part.

Attorney General Opinions. Subject to any regulations or restrictions related to state contracts, the department of human services' services for the blind program may contract with a private vending machine management company to arrange for third party vending and to collect commissions from the operation of vending machines on its behalf, OAG 04-166, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 177 (11/19/04).

If the department of human services elects to contract with third parties for the provision of vending services at unassigned vending facilities on public property, both parties' authority, including the authority to set the prices of products to be vended, would be determined by reference to the relevant contract, OAG 04-166, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 177 (11/19/04).

71-4-505. Cafeterias.

The priority established by this part applies to cafeterias, as defined by the department, as limited by this section.

If a new cafeteria is to be constructed on public property or any existing cafeteria contracts on public properties expire, or both, the department shall receive notification pursuant to § 71-4-503 and shall be afforded the opportunity to submit a proposal for the operation of the proposed cafeteria. If the department's proposal, when considered with all other proposals, is found to be competitive in terms of quality of service, pricing of merchandise, and the rate of commission or the rental to be paid, then a priority shall be granted to the department and the cafeteria operation shall be awarded to the department. The department's proposal will not be considered competitive if its proposed payment of annual commissions, rental fees, or a combination of annual commission and rental fees, is not within two percent (2%) of that submitted by an organization that would otherwise be awarded the cafeteria operation. Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow the property management to take any action regarding an existing facility to defeat an already existing priority.

If the department's proposal is rejected and there is disagreement as to whether the department's proposal is competitive, the dispute shall be resolved in accordance with § 71-4-507.

Acts 1994, ch. 723, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 5, §§71-4-501—71-4-509 (Acts 1967, ch. 46, § 1; 1967, ch. 349, § 1; 1973, ch. 372, §§ 1-6; 1975, ch. 176, § 1; 1978, ch. 658, § 658; T.C.A., §§ 14-636, 14-637, 14-640—14-645; Acts 1983, ch. 473, § 1; 1985, ch. 240, § 1; T.C.A., §§14-14-501—14-14-508), concerning vocational services to the blind and vending stands, was repealed by Acts 1994, ch. 723, § 2, effective July 1, 1994. For present provisions, see this part.

71-4-506. Effect of part.

Nothing in this part shall supersede any cooperative agreements that are in effect between the department and public property management on July 1, 1994, regarding the current operation of vending facilities on public properties, nor shall anything in this part preclude the department from entering into future agreements that may be less restrictive than this part, if, in the department's judgment, such agreements are in the best interest of the program.

Acts 1994, ch. 723, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 5, §§71-4-501—71-4-509 (Acts 1967, ch. 46, § 1; 1967, ch. 349, § 1; 1973, ch. 372, §§ 1-6; 1975, ch. 176, § 1; 1978, ch. 658, § 658; T.C.A., §§ 14-636, 14-637, 14-640—14-645; Acts 1983, ch. 473, § 1; 1985, ch. 240, § 1; T.C.A., §§14-14-501—14-14-508), concerning vocational services to the blind and vending stands, was repealed by Acts 1994, ch. 723, § 2, effective July 1, 1994. For present provisions, see this part.

71-4-507. Dispute resolution.

Except as stated in subsection (b), if a dispute arises between the management of public property and the department concerning any matter contained in this part, then either party may file a complaint setting forth the dispute with the secretary of state. Within ten (10) days of the filing of the complaint, the secretary of state shall appoint an administrative law judge from the administrative procedures division of the secretary of state's office who shall set an administrative hearing to be held under the Uniform Administrative Procedure Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, part 3, within thirty (30) days of the appointment, unless for good cause shown a later time is deemed necessary. Notwithstanding other provisions of the law to the contrary, the secretary of state or the secretary of state's designee has the authority to render a final order following entry of an initial order by the administrative law judge. Such order shall be appealable as provided by § 4-5-322.

The secretary of state shall be without jurisdiction to hear any complaint concerning the qualifications or status of a licensed or temporary manager who is operating under a license or agreement of the department, and shall be without jurisdiction to hear or establish any damage award for or against any person, any officer or employee of the state, or any public property's governing body or its officers or employees.

The case may be heard and decided entirely upon stipulations and briefs of all parties without the presentation of oral or other written evidence, it being the intent of the general assembly to allow for an early resolution to the disputes arising under this part.

Acts 1994, ch. 723, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 5, §§71-4-501—71-4-509 (Acts 1967, ch. 46, § 1; 1967, ch. 349, § 1; 1973, ch. 372, §§ 1-6; 1975, ch. 176, § 1; 1978, ch. 658, § 658; T.C.A., §§ 14-636, 14-637, 14-640—14-645; Acts 1983, ch. 473, § 1; 1985, ch. 240, § 1; T.C.A., §§14-14-501—14-14-508), concerning vocational services to the blind and vending stands, was repealed by Acts 1994, ch. 723, § 2, effective July 1, 1994. For present provisions, see this part.

Attorney General Opinions. There are no specific statutory remedies for a public property's failure to recognize the priority established under T.C.A. §71-4-502(3); instead, a dispute resolution mechanism for disputes that may arise between the department of human services and the management of public property “concerning any matter contained in this part” is provided pursuant to this section, OAG 04-166, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 177 (11/19/04).

There are no specific statutory remedies for a public property's failure to recognize the priority established under T.C.A. §71-4-502(3); instead, a dispute resolution mechanism for disputes that may arise between the department of human services and the management of public property “concerning any matter contained in this part” is provided pursuant to this section, OAG 04-166, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 177 (11/19/04).

71-4-508. Administrative review or evidentiary hearing.

The department has exclusive jurisdiction to provide an opportunity for an administrative review or evidentiary hearing to a blind individual under this part who is dissatisfied with any action arising from the operation or administration of the vending facility program.

The aggrieved blind individual licensed by the department shall submit a written request to the director of services for the blind for an administrative review or a full evidentiary hearing pursuant to the rules and regulations promulgated by the department, which shall be provided by the department to the blind individual. If the blind individual is dissatisfied with any action taken or decision rendered as a result of such hearing, that individual may file a complaint with the United States secretary of education for an arbitration hearing as provided by federal law and regulations.

Nothing in this part shall be construed as a waiver of the state's sovereign immunity under the Eleventh Amendment of the Constitution of the United States or under the Constitution of Tennessee.

Acts 1994, ch. 723, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 5, §§71-4-501—71-4-509 (Acts 1967, ch. 46, § 1; 1967, ch. 349, § 1; 1973, ch. 372, §§ 1-6; 1975, ch. 176, § 1; 1978, ch. 658, § 658; T.C.A., §§ 14-636, 14-637, 14-640—14-645; Acts 1983, ch. 473, § 1; 1985, ch. 240, § 1; T.C.A., §§14-14-501—14-14-508), concerning vocational services to the blind and vending stands, was repealed by Acts 1994, ch. 723, § 2, effective July 1, 1994. For present provisions, see this part.

71-4-509. Proceeds set aside for blind vendors.

After considering the recommendation from the committee of blind vendors, the department shall set aside or cause to be set aside a percentage of the net proceeds of the vending facilities in a reasonable amount not to exceed fifteen percent (15%) of their net income and pursuant to a schedule approved by the United States secretary of education. Such funds shall be expended on behalf of blind vendors only for purposes specified by regulations promulgated in accordance with the Randolph-Sheppard Act (20 U.S.C. §§ 107-107f).

All funds set aside pursuant to subsection (a) and funds in the account for unassigned funds established for the blind vendors program, and all other revenue, except funds appropriated by the state or matching federal funds, shall be invested by the state treasurer pursuant to § 9-4-603, for the benefit of those funds.

Acts 1994, ch. 723, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 5, §§71-4-501—71-4-509 (Acts 1967, ch. 46, § 1; 1967, ch. 349, § 1; 1973, ch. 372, §§ 1-6; 1975, ch. 176, § 1; 1978, ch. 658, § 658; T.C.A., §§ 14-636, 14-637, 14-640—14-645; Acts 1983, ch. 473, § 1; 1985, ch. 240, § 1; T.C.A., §§14-14-501—14-14-508), concerning vocational services to the blind and vending stands, was repealed by Acts 1994, ch. 723, § 2, effective July 1, 1994. For present provisions, see this part.